District of Columbia statutes.
11-1702

Responsibilities of chief judges in the respective courts.

(a)

The Chief Judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, in addition to the authority conferred on the Chief Judge by Chapter 7 of this title, shall supervise the internal administration of that court —

(1)

including all administrative matters other than those within the responsibility enumerated in section 11-1701(b), and

(2)

including the implementation in that court of the matters enumerated in section 11-1701(b),

consistent with the general policies and directives of the Joint Committee.

(b)

The Chief Judge of the Superior Court, in addition to the authority conferred on the Chief Judge by Chapter 9 of this title, shall supervise the internal administration of that court —

(1)

including all administrative matters other than those within the responsibility enumerated in section 11-1701(b), and

(2)

including the implementation in that court of the matters enumerated in section 11-1701(b),

consistent with the general policies and directives of the Joint Committee.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(81), 108 Stat. 713

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1702.
1973 Ed., § 11-1702.